Utah statutes.
58-60-113.   Evidentiary privilege.
Evidentiary privilege for mental health therapists regarding admissibility of
any confidential communication in administrative, civil, or criminal
proceedings is in accordance with Rule 506 of the Utah Rules of Evidence.
